District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.21

Emergency medical services for children.

The Mayor shall establish, in collaboration with a licensed hospital within the District of Columbia specializing in pediatric care, a program of emergency medical services for children. The purpose of this program shall be to continue, to the extent that funds are made available through federal government grants, District appropriated funds, or private sources, the operation and development of programs designed to improve the emergency medical care provided to children within the District of Columbia.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 22, 56 DCR 1167